Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.185.010

Program—Duties of superintendent of public instruction.

Pursuant to rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction for the administration of this chapter, the superintendent of public instruction shall carry out a program for highly capable students. Such program may include conducting, coordinating and aiding in research (including pilot programs), disseminating information to local school districts, providing statewide staff development, and allocating to school districts supplementary funds for additional costs of district programs, as provided by RCW 28A.150.260.

[ 2009 c 548 s 707; 1984 c 278 s 12. Formerly RCW 28A.16.040.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 548 ss 101-110 and 701-710: See note following RCW 28A.150.200.

Intent—2009 c 548: See RCW 28A.150.1981.

Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.410.270.

Intent—Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.305.130.

Severability—1984 c 278: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1984 c 278 s 24.]